src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON INDPRSSG3-em
 +Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>%{аӓ%} K ;

!LEXICON INDPRSPL1-em
! +Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>енӓ K ;

!LEXICON INDPRSPL2-em
! +Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>едӓ K ;

LEXICON INDPRSPL3-em
 +Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>%{аӓ%}т K ;

!LEXICON INDPRSCONNEG-em
! +Ind+Prs+ConNeg:%>%{ыӹØ%} K ;

!LEXICON INDPRSPL3CONNEG-em
! +Ind+Prs+Pl3+ConNeg:%>Е2п K ;



!! ## PRETERIT 1

!! ### am

LEXICON INDPRT1SG1-am
 +Ind+Prt1+Sg1:Ь2%>%{ыӹØ%}м K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1SG2-am
 +Ind+Prt1+Sg2:Ь2%>%{ыӹØ%}ц K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1SG3-am
 +Ind+Prt1+Sg3:Ь2%>%{ыӹØ%} K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1PL1-am
 +Ind+Prt1+Pl1:%^ConsTransfЬ2%>н%{аӓ%} K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1PL2-am
 +Ind+Prt1+Pl2:%^ConsTransfЬ2%>д%{аӓ%} K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1PL3-am
 +Ind+Prt1+Pl3:%>евӹ K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1CONNEG-am
 +Ind+Prt1+ConNeg:%^ConsTransf K ;

LEXICON INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-am
 +Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg:%^ConsTransf%>Е2п K ;

!! ### em

LEXICON INDPRT1SG1-em
 +Ind+Prt1+Sg1:%>ш%>%{ыӹØ%}м K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1SG2-em
 +Ind+Prt1+Sg2:%>ш%>%{ыӹØ%}ц K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1SG3-em
 +Ind+Prt1+Sg3:%>ш K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1PL1-em
 +Ind+Prt1+Pl1:%>шн%{аӓ%} K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1PL2-em
 +Ind+Prt1+Pl2:%>шд%{аӓ%} K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1PL3-em
 +Ind+Prt1+Pl3:%>Е2вӹ K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT1CONNEG-em
 +Ind+Prt1+ConNeg:%>%{ыӹØ%} K ;

LEXICON INDPRT1PL3CONNEG-em
 +Ind+Prt1+Pl3+ConNeg:%>Е2п K ;

!! ## PRETERIT 2

!! ### am
LEXICON INDPRT2SG1-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Sg1:%>%{ыӹе%}н%{аӓ%}м K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT2SG2-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Sg2:%>%{ыӹе%}н%{аӓ%}т K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT2SG3-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Sg3:%>%{ыӹе%}н K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT2PL1-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Pl1:%>%{ыӹе%}нн%{аӓ%} K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT2PL2-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Pl2:%>%{ыӹе%}нд%{аӓ%} K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT2PL3-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Pl3:%>%{ыӹе%}н%{ыӹØ%}т K ; !

LEXICON INDPRT2NEG-am
                                       INDPRT2NEGSG1-am ;
                                       INDPRT2NEGSG2-am ;
                                       INDPRT2NEGSG3-am ;
                                       INDPRT2NEGPL1-am ;
                                       INDPRT2NEGPL2-am ;
                                       INDPRT2NEGPL3-am ;

LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGSG1-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1:%^ConsTransf%>делам K                ;
LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGSG2-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg2:%^ConsTransf%>делат K                ;
LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGSG3-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3:%^ConsTransf%>де    K                ;
LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGPL1-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1:%^ConsTransf%>делна K                ;
LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGPL2-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl2:%^ConsTransf%>делда K                ;
LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGPL3-am
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3:%^ConsTransf%>делыт K                ;

!! ### em

!LEXICON INDPRT2SG1-em
! +Ind+Prt2+Sg1:%>Е2н%{аӓ%}м K ; !

!LEXICON INDPRT2SG2-em
! +Ind+Prt2+Sg2:%>Е2н%{аӓ%}т K ; !

!LEXICON INDPRT2SG3-em
! +Ind+Prt2+Sg3:%>Е2н K ; !

!LEXICON INDPRT2PL1-em
! +Ind+Prt2+Pl1:%>Е2ннӓ K ; !

!LEXICON INDPRT2PL2-em
! +Ind+Prt2+Pl2:%>Е2ндӓ K ; !

!LEXICON INDPRT2PL3-em
! +Ind+Prt2+Pl3:%>Е2нӹт K ; !

!LEXICON INDPRT2NEG-em
!                                  INDPRT2NEGSG1-em ;
!                                  INDPRT2NEGSG2-em ;
!                                  INDPRT2NEGSG3-em ;
!                                  INDPRT2NEGPL1-em ;
!                                  INDPRT2NEGPL2-em ;
!                                  INDPRT2NEGPL3-em ;

LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGSG1-em
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg1:%>%{ыӹØ%}делам K                ;
LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGSG2-em
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg2:%>%{ыӹØ%}делат K                ;
LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGSG3-em
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Sg3:%>%{ыӹØ%}де    K                ;
LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGPL1-em
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl1:%>%{ыӹØ%}делна K                ;
LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGPL2-em
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl2:%>%{ыӹØ%}делда K                ;
LEXICON	INDPRT2NEGPL3-em
 +Ind+Prt2+Neg+Pl3:%>%{ыӹØ%}делыт K                ;

!! ## IMPERATIVE


LEXICON IMPRTSG2-am
 +Imprt+Sg2:%^ConsTransf K ; !

LEXICON IMPRTSG3-am
 +Imprt+Sg3:%^ConsTransf%>ж%{ыӹ%} K ;

LEXICON IMPRTPL2-am
 +Imprt+Pl2:%>д%{аӓ%} K ; !

LEXICON IMPRTPL3-am
 +Imprt+Pl3:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹ%} K ;

LEXICON IMPRTIISG2-am
 +ImprtII+Sg2:%>%{ыӹе%}м%{аӓ%} K ; !

LEXICON IMPRTIIPL2-am
 +ImprtII+Pl2:%>%{ыӹе%}м%{аӓ%}д%{аӓ%} K ; !


!LEXICON IMPRTSG2-em
! +Imprt+Sg2:%>%{ыӹØ%} K ; !

!LEXICON IMPRTSG3-em
! +Imprt+Sg3:%>%{ыӹØ%}ж%{ыӹ%} K ;

!LEXICON IMPRTPL2-em
! +Imprt+Pl2:%>%{ыӹØ%}д%{аӓ%} K ; !

!LEXICON IMPRTPL3-em
! +Imprt+Pl3:%>%{ыӹØ%}шт%{ыӹ%} K ;

!LEXICON IMPRTIISG2-em
! +ImprtII+Sg2:%>Е2мӓ K ; !

!LEXICON IMPRTIIPL2-em
! +ImprtII+Pl2:%>Е2мӓдӓ K ; !

!! ## DESIDERATIVE
LEXICON DES-am
  DESSG1-am ;
  DESSG2-am ;
  DESSG3-am ;
  DESPL1-am ;
  DESPL2-am ;
  DESPL3-am ;
LEXICON DESSG1-am
 +Des+Sg1:%^ConsTransf%>нем K ;
LEXICON DESSG2-am
 +Des+Sg2:%^ConsTransf%>нет K ;
LEXICON DESSG3-am
 +Des+Sg3:%^ConsTransf%>нежӹ K ;
LEXICON DESPL1-am
 +Des+Pl1:%^ConsTransf%>ненӓ K ;
LEXICON DESPL2-am
 +Des+Pl2:%^ConsTransf%>недӓ K ;
LEXICON DESPL3-am
 +Des+Pl3:%^ConsTransf%>нештӹ K ;

LEXICON DES-em
  DESSG1-em ;
  DESSG2-em ;
  DESSG3-em ;
  DESPL1-em ;
  DESPL2-em ;
  DESPL3-em ;
LEXICON DESSG1-em
 +Des+Sg1:%>%{ыӹØ%}нем K ;
LEXICON DESSG2-em
 +Des+Sg2:%>%{ыӹØ%}нет K ;
LEXICON DESSG3-em
 +Des+Sg3:%>%{ыӹØ%}нежӹ K ;
LEXICON DESPL1-em
 +Des+Pl1:%>%{ыӹØ%}ненӓ K ;
LEXICON DESPL2-em
 +Des+Pl2:%>%{ыӹØ%}недӓ K ;
LEXICON DESPL3-em
 +Des+Pl3:%>%{ыӹØ%}нештӹ K ;


!! ## INFINITIVE


LEXICON INF
 +Inf:%>%{аӓ%}ш K ;

LEXICON NEG-PRC
        +Der+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc:%>д%{ыӹ%}м%{ыӹØ%}                 NMN_TYERVYE ;
 +Der+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Lat:%>д%{ыӹ%}м%{ыӹØ%}%>м%{ыӹØ%}%>ешкӹ K         ;

LEXICON PASS-PRC
        +Der+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc:%>м%{ыӹØ%}       NMN_TYERVYE ;
 +Der+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Lat:%>м%{ыӹØ%}%>ешкӹ K         ; ! ()


LEXICON INF_BACK
 +Inf:%>аш K ;

LEXICON NEG-PRC_BACK
        +Der+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc:%>дымы       NMN_MARY ;
 +Der+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Lat:%>дымы%>ешкӹ K        ;

LEXICON PASS-PRC_BACK
        +Der+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc:%>мы       NMN_MARY ;
 +Der+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Lat:%>мы%>ешкӹ K        ; ! ()

LEXICON ACT-PRC_BACK
 +Der+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc:%>шы K        ; !!
 +Der+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc:%>шы NMN_MARY ;

LEXICON INF_FRONT
 +Inf:%>ӓш K ;

LEXICON NEG-PRC_FRONT
        +Der+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc:%>дӹмӹ           NMN_TYERVYE ;
 +Der+Der/дЫмЫ+NegPrc+Sg+Lat:%>дӹмӹ%>мӹ%>ешкӹ K         ;

LEXICON PASS-PRC_FRONT
        +Der+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc:%>мӹ       NMN_TYERVYE ;
 +Der+Der/мЫ+Pass+Prc+Sg+Lat:%>мӹ%>ешкӹ K         ; ! ()

LEXICON ACT-PRC_FRONT
 +Der+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc:%>шӹ K         ; !!
 +Der+Der/шЫ+Act+Prc:%>шӹ NMN_TYERVYE ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
